Utah statutes.
61-2g-301.   License or certification required.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), it is unlawful for a person to prepare, for valuable consideration, an appraisal, an appraisal report, a certified appraisal report, or perform a consultation service relating to real estate or real property in this state without first being licensed or certified in accordance with this chapter.

(2)  This section does not apply to:

(a)  a principal broker, associate broker, or sales agent as defined by Section 61-2f-102 licensed by this state who, in the ordinary course of the broker's or sales agent's business, gives an opinion:

(i)  regarding the value of real estate;

(ii)  to a potential seller or third-party recommending a listing price of real estate; or

(iii)  to a potential buyer or third-party recommending a purchase price of real estate;

(b)  an employee of a company who states an opinion of value or prepares a report containing value conclusions relating to real estate or real property solely for the company's use;

(c)  an official or employee of a government agency while acting solely within the scope of the official's or employee's duties, unless otherwise required by Utah law;

(d)  an auditor or accountant who states an opinion of value or prepares a report containing value conclusions relating to real estate or real property while performing an audit;

(e)  an individual, except an individual who is required to be licensed or certified under this chapter, who states an opinion about the value of property in which the person has an ownership interest;

(f)  an individual who states an opinion of value if no consideration is paid or agreed to be paid for the opinion and no other party is reasonably expected to rely on the individual's appraisal expertise;

(g)  an individual, such as a researcher or a secretary, who does not render significant professional assistance, as defined by the board, in arriving at a real estate appraisal analysis, opinion, or conclusion; or

(h)  an attorney authorized to practice law in any state who, in the course of the attorney's practice or tax appeal services, uses an appraisal report governed by this chapter or who states an opinion of the value of real estate.

(3)  An opinion of value or report containing value conclusions exempt under Subsection (2) may not be referred to as an appraisal.

(4)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), to prepare or cause to be prepared in this state an appraisal, an appraisal report, or a certified appraisal report an individual shall:

(a)  apply in writing for licensure or certification as provided in this chapter in the form as the division may prescribe; and

(b)  become licensed or certified under this chapter.

